Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-729
Management area; contamination; action plan; district publish order adopted.

Following approval of the action plan by the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment, the district shall cause a copy of the order adopted pursuant to section 46-728 to be published in the manner provided in section 46-744.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.11;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 49;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.43;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 69;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 37;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 227.